Missouri, session 2026, HB1860.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 650, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 650.935, to read as follows:
650.935. 1. There is hereby created the "Task Force on Gun Violence in the City
of St. Louis" to consist of the following members:
(1) The following four members of the general assembly:
(a) Two members of the senate, with one member to be appointed by the
president pro tempore of the senate and one member to be appointed by the minority
floor leader of the senate; and
(b) Two members of the house of representatives, with one member to be
appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives and one member to be
appointed by the minority floor leader of the house of representatives;
(2) The director of the department of public safety or his or her designee; and
(3) Eight members from the city of St. Louis community to be appointed by the
director of public safety, as follows:
(a) A member from the St. Louis Metropolitan Police Department;
(b) A member who is a school administrator;
(c) A member who is a high school teacher;
(d) A member who is a middle school teacher;
(e) A member who is a parent of a school-age child;
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 1860 2
(f) A member who is a student who represents the Gun Safety Student
Ambassadors; and
(g) Two members who represent the city of St. Louis community at large.
2. The task force shall appoint a chair who is elected by a majority vote of the
members of the task force. The task force shall have an initial meeting before January
1, 2027, and shall meet each month thereafter. The members of the task force shall serve
without compensation but shall be entitled to necessary and actual expenses incurred in
attending meetings of the task force.
3. The task force shall establish specialized teams that focus on the following:
(1) Gathering and analyzing data comparing the city of St. Louis to the rest of
the state, with consideration given to rates of gun violence, demographics, and policies;
(2) Utilizing social media, storytelling, and events to raise awareness about gun
violence in the city of St. Louis and to evoke community action;
(3) Building partnerships within the community and securing support from
sponsors, organizations, and community members;
(4) Developing solutions and implementing a plan of action to address and
reduce gun violence; and
(5) Measuring and reflecting on progress within the community.
4. The department of public safety shall provide administrative support to the
task force.
5. On or before December thirty-first of each year, the task force shall submit a
report on its findings to the governor and the general assembly.
6. The task force shall expire on December 31, 2028, unless extended until
December 31, 2030, as determined necessary by the department of public safety.
✔